test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-М_С-пол_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - пол M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      пол+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: по́л
      пол+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: по́л
      пол+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: по́ла
      пол+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: по́ле
      пол+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: по́лу
      пол+N+Msc+Sg+Ins: по́лом
      пол+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: полы́
      пол+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Inan: полы́
      пол+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: поло́в
      пол+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: пола́х
      пол+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: пола́м
      пол+N+Msc+Pl+Ins: пола́ми
